Nebraska, session 109, LB420.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB420 LB420
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-1501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1501 (1) The Public Employees Retirement Board is hereby
established.
(2)(a) The board shall consist of nine appointed members as
described in this subsection and the state investment officer as a
nonvoting, ex officio member. Seven of the appointed members shall be
active or retired participants in the retirement systems administered by
the board, and two of the appointed members (i) shall not be employees of
the State of Nebraska or any of its political subdivisions and (ii) shall
have at least ten years of experience in the management of a public or
private organization or have at least ten five years of experience in the
field of actuarial analysis or the administration of an employee benefit
plan.
(b) The appointed members who are participants in the retirement
systems shall be as follows:
(i) Two of the appointed members shall be participants in the School
Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska and shall include
one administrator and one teacher;
(ii) One of the appointed members shall be a participant in the
Nebraska Judges Retirement System as provided in the Judges Retirement
Act;
(iii) One of the appointed members shall be a participant in the
Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System;
(iv) One of the appointed members shall be a participant in the
Retirement System for Nebraska Counties;
(v) One of the appointed members shall be a participant in the State
Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska; and
(vi) Beginning September 1, 2024, one of the appointed members shall
be a participant who is a teacher in a retirement system established
under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Prior to September 1,
-2-

LB420 LB420
2025 2025
2024, such member shall be a nonvoting, ex officio member.
(c) Appointments to the board shall be made by the Governor and
shall be subject to the approval of the Legislature. All appointed
members shall be citizens of the State of Nebraska.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all members
shall serve for terms of five years or until a successor has been
appointed and qualified. The terms shall begin on January 1 of the
appropriate year.
(b) To ensure an experienced and knowledgeable board, the terms of
the appointed members shall be staggered as follows:
(i) One of the two members described in subdivisions (2)(a)(i) and
(ii) of this section shall be appointed to serve for a five-year term
which begins in 2017;
(ii) One of the two members described in subdivisions (2)(a)(i) and
(ii) of this section shall be appointed to serve for a five-year term
which begins in 2018;
(iii) The participant in the School Employees Retirement System of
the State of Nebraska who is a teacher shall be appointed for a five-year
term which begins in 2019;
(iv) The participant in the School Employees Retirement System of
the State of Nebraska who is an administrator and the participant in the
State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska shall be
appointed for a five-year term which begins in 2020;
(v) The participant in the Retirement System for Nebraska Counties
and the participant in the Nebraska Judges Retirement System shall be
appointed to serve for a five-year term which begins in 2021;
(vi) The participant in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System
shall be appointed to serve for a three-year term which begins in 2020,
and his or her successor shall be appointed to serve for a five-year term
which begins in 2023; and
(vii) The participant in a retirement system established under the
-3-

LB420 LB420
2025 2025
Class V School Employees Retirement Act shall be appointed to serve for a
fifty-two-month term which begins September 1, 2024, and his or her
successor shall be appointed to serve for a five-year term which begins
in 2029.
(4) In the event of a vacancy in office, the Governor shall appoint
a person to serve the unexpired portion of the term subject to the
approval of the Legislature.
(5) The appointed members of the board may be removed by the
Governor for cause after notice and an opportunity to be heard.
Sec. 2. Original section 84-1501, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-